pl: Standard kompatybilności wiązań: 3-pin; Zjazdowe DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrydowe; Dziecięce DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Kłowe (Tech/Pin); Skiturowe ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Inne
bg-BG: Стандарт за съвместимост на автомата (ски връзките): 3-пинови; Алпийски DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Хибридни; Детски DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Туринг ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Други
nb: Standard for bindingskompatibilitet: 3-pins; Alpint DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrid; Barn DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Annet
zh-TW: 固定器相容性標準: 3-Pin; 高山滑雪 DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; 混合式; 兒童 DIN; MNC (多重標準認證); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); 登山滑雪 ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); 其他
fr: Norme de compatibilité des fixations: 3 broches; Alpin DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybride; DIN pour enfants; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Autre
it: Standard di compatibilità vincolante: 3 pin; Alpino DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Ibrido; DIN per bambini; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Altro
sv: Standard för bindningskompatibilitet: 3-pin; Alpin DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrid; Barn DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Övrigt
ja: ビンディング互換性規格: 3ピン; アルペンDIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; ハイブリッド; キッズDIN; MNC (マルチ規格認証); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (ピン); ツーリングISO 9523; WTR (ウォークトゥライド); その他
lt-LT: Įrišimo suderinamumo standartas: 3 kontaktų („3-Pin“); Kalnų DIN ISO 5355; „GripWalk“ ISO 23223; Hibridinis; Vaikiškas DIN; MNC (sertifikuota pagal kelis standartus); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; „Tech“ („Pin“); „Touring“ ISO 9523; WTR („Walk-To-Ride“); Kita
en: Binding compatibility standard: 3-Pin; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrid; Kids DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Other
da: Standard for bindingskompatibilitet: 3-pin; Alpin DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrid; Børne-DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Andet
th: มาตรฐานความเข้ากันได้ของตัวล็อก: 3 พิน; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; ไฮบริด; Kids DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (พิน); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); อื่นๆ
nl: Bindingscompatibiliteit norm: 3-pins; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybride; Kids DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Anders
sk-SK: Norma kompatibility viazania: 3-Pin; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybridné; Detské DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Iné
ru: Стандарт совместимости креплений: 3-Pin; Горнолыжный DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Гибридный; Детский DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Пиновые (Tech); Туринг ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Другое
hu: Kötéskompatibilitási szabvány: 3-tűs (3-Pin); Alpesi DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hibrid; Gyerek DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (tűs); Túra ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Egyéb
de: Bindungskompatibilitätsstandard: 3-Pin; Alpin DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybrid; Kinder-DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Sonstige
pt-PT: Norma de compatibilidade de encadernação: 3 pinos; Alpina DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Híbrida; Crianças DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tecnologia (pinos); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Outros
sl-SI: Standard združljivosti vezi: 3-Pin; Alpski DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hibridno; Otroški DIN; MNC (večnormni certifikat); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Turno ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Drugo
es: Estándar de compatibilidad de la fijación: 3 clavijas; DIN alpino ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Híbrido; DIN para niños; MNC (con certificación multinorma); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (clavijas); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Otro
pt-BR: Padrão de compatibilidade da fixação: 3 pinos; Alpino DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Híbrido; DIN infantil; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pinos); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Outro
el: Πρότυπο συμβατότητας σύνδεσης: 3-Pin; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Υβριδικό; Παιδικό DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Άλλο
cs: Označuje typ maziva aplikovaného na ložisko během výroby, například plastické mazivo nebo olej.: 3-Pin; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybridní; Kids DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Jiné
zh-CN: 固定器适配标准: 3 针; 高山 DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; 混合; 儿童 DIN; MNC（多重规范认证）; NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; 科技固定器（针脚）; 巡回 ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); 其他
vi: Tiêu chuẩn tương thích với khóa trượt tuyết: 3 chấu; Alpine DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Lai; DIN trẻ em; MNC (Được chứng nhận đa tiêu chuẩn); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Khác
ro-RO: Standard de compatibilitate a legăturilor: 3 Pini; Alpin DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hibrid; DIN copii; MNC (Certificare Multi Norm); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Altele
fi: Kiinnityksen yhteensopivuusstandardi: 3-pin; Alppi DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hybridi; Lasten DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Muu
tr: Bağlama uyumluluk standardı: 3 Pim (3-Pin); Alp Disiplini DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hibrit; Çocuk DIN; MNC (Çoklu Norm Sertifikalı); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pim); Tur Kayağı ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Diğer
ko: 바인딩 호환 규격: 3핀; 알파인 DIN ISO 5355; 그립워크 ISO 23223; 하이브리드; 키즈 DIN; MNC(멀티 노름 인증); NNN; NNN BC; 프로링크; 테크(핀); 투어링 ISO 9523; WTR(Walk-To-Ride); 기타
hr-HR: Standard kompatibilnosti vezova: 3-Pin; Alpski DIN ISO 5355; GripWalk ISO 23223; Hibridni; Dječji DIN; MNC (Multi Norm Certified); NNN; NNN BC; Prolink; Tech (Pin); Touring ISO 9523; WTR (Walk-To-Ride); Ostalo